Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
REAL ACTIONS

Law Journals and Reviews

The Statutory Elements of Hawaii's Adverse Possession Law.
14 HBJ, no. 2, at 67 (1978).

§657-31 Twenty years. No person shall
commence an action to recover possession of any lands, or make any entry thereon,
unless within twenty years after the right to bring the action first accrued.
[L 1870, c 22, §1; am L 1898, c 19, §1; RL 1925, §2657; RL 1935, §3928; RL
1945, §10439; RL 1955, §241-30; HRS §657-31; am L 1973, c 26, §4]

Law Journals and Reviews

Beach Access: A Public Right? 23 HBJ, no. 1, at 65 (1991).

Public Beach Access: A Right for All? Opening the Gate to
Iroquois Point Beach. 30 UH L. Rev. 495 (2008).

Case Notes

Easement by prescription. 36 H. 692 (1944).

Entry means entry by claimant personally as well as entry
through another. 54 H. 488, 510 P.2d 93 (1973).

Exclusivity of possession is essential to claim of adverse
possession. 57 H. 172, 552 P.2d 77 (1976).

A tenant in common claiming adverse possession must prove
tenant acted in good faith, which in most cases mandates actual notice to
tenant's cotenants of tenant's claim. 57 H. 195, 552 P.2d 1380 (1976).

Element of hostility discussed. 60 H. 650, 594 P.2d 128
(1979).

Saving clause in 1973 amendment requires application of prior
law's ten-year period of limitations in adverse possession case. 3 H. App. 11,
639 P.2d 1119 (1982).

Miscellaneous. Doctrine of lost grant invoked against
State. 25 H. 357 (1920), aff'd 272 F. 856 (1921). As to dower being barred.
6 H. 651 (1887); 15 H. 284 (1903). As to curtesy. 16 H. 432 (1905). May run
in favor of married woman. 9 H. 135 (1893). Parol gift of land followed by
required period of adverse possession cannot be disturbed. 10 H. 495 (1896).
Parol exchange. 4 H. 198 (1879). Foreclosure of mortgage. 14 H. 527 (1902);
15 H. 507 (1904); 17 H. 49 (1905); 19 H. 382 (1909); 20 H. 620 (1911).
Deficiency judgment. 20 H. 620 (1911). Term "entry" has common law
meaning. 19 H. 681 (1909). Interruption of statute. 22 H. 673 (1915); 30 H.
204 (1927). Running of statute not checked by conveyance to minor. 24 H. 1, 6
(1917). As to cotenant and ouster. 24 H. 361 (1918). Acceptance of deed does
not necessarily affect adverse possession. 5 H. 104 (1884); 48 H. 17, 395 P.2d
273 (1964). Acceptance by defendant of Royal Patent in name of plaintiff. 6
H. 390 (1883). Legal presumption of a deed. 24 H. 750 (1919). Basis of
statute differs from laches. 25 H. 438 (1920), aff'd 269 F. 751 (1921).
Statute distinguished from presumption of lost grant. 25 H. 357 (1920), aff'd
272 F. 577 (1921). Tacking and taxes. 31 H. 108 (1929). Directed verdict,
possession less than ten years. 31 H. 436 (1930). Where evidence of adverse
possession is clear and undisputed it is error not to direct a verdict. 48 H.
17, 395 P.2d 273 (1964). Fractional interests. 30 H. 100 (1927).

Requirements of adverse possession. 7 H. 590 (1889); 11 H.
518 (1898); 14 H. 321 (1902); 14 H. 330 (1902); 26 H. 809 (1923). Occasional
visits to land without residence or occupation held insufficient. 4 H. 207
(1879). Long acquiescence in adverse possession though not a bar till after
statutory period held to be significant. 6 H. 700 (1888). Plaintiff in
ejectment need not show possession within statutory period if plaintiff shows
title and no adverse possession is proved. 7 H. 324 (1888). Landlord and
tenant. 12 H. 142 (1899). Konohiki and tenant. 4 H. 259 (1879); 10 H. 166
(1895); 15 H. 124 (1903); 19 H. 484 (1909). As between cotenants. 4 H. 42
(1877); 5 H. 491 (1885); 7 H. 575 (1889); 10 H. 583 (1897); 13 H. 716 (1901);
16 H. 228 (1904); 20 H. 724 (1911); 36 H. 614 (1944); 39 H. 327 (1952). As to
infants. 7 H. 421 (1888); 16 H. 228 (1904). Possession by administrator. 4
H. 571 (1883); 4 H. 577 (1883). After administrator's discharge administrator
holds realty adverse to the heirs. 6 H. 183 (1876). Claim must be ownership
in fee. 16 H. 432 (1905); 18 H. 662 (1907); 19 H. 602 (1909); 22 H. 510
(1915). Claim under defective title. 9 H. 135 (1893). Claim where possession
commenced with permission. 4 H. 481 (1882); 29 H. 750 (1927). By more than
one person. 31 H. 661 (1930). Recognition of title in another inconsistent
with adverse possession. 37 H. 49 (1945). See 33 H. 387 (1935); 34 H. 679
(1938); 34 H. 722 (1938); 36 H. 164 (1942); 39 H. 482 (1952). Prima facie case
of constructive adverse possession. 50 H. 369, 440 P.2d 965 (1968).

Exceptions. Does not run against government. 3 H. 635
(1875); 7 H. 421 (1888); 16 H. 652 (1905); 18 H. 649 (1908). Did run against
king on private lands. 14 H. 330 (1902); 14 H. 643 (1903). Mental
incompetent. 31 H. 817 (1931).

Cited: 3 H. 610, 612 (1875); 3 H. 768, 776 (1877); 5 H. 377,
378 (1885); 5 H. 525 (1886); 6 H. 329, 330 (1882); 6 H. 545 (1884); 6 H. 573
(1885); 7 H. 575, 577 (1889); 8 H. 508, 510 (1893); 10 H. 573, 574 (1897); 11
H. 644, 649 (1899); 11 H. 755, 757 (1899); 14 H. 643, 644 (1903); 16 H. 345,
347 (1904); 18 H. 121, 123 (1906); 21 H. 252, 253 (1912); 31 H. 376, 383 (1930);
31 H. 796, 798 (1931); 32 H. 659, 661 (1933); 48 H. 17, 19, 395 P.2d 273
(1964); 49 H. 537, 553, 425 P.2d 83 (1967); 73 H. 297, 832 P.2d 724 (1992).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next